Louisiana, session 2026, SB500.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:1231.8(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1231.8. Medical review panel; certificate of merit
A.(1)(a)(i) All malpractice claims against health care providers covered by
this Part, other than claims validly agreed for submission to a lawfully binding
arbitration procedure, shall at the claimant's election be filed in a court of
competent jurisdiction with a certificate of merit or, prior to initiation of
judicial proceedings, be reviewed by a medical review panel established as
hereinafter provided for in this Section.
(ii) If the claimant elects to file a certificate of merit pursuant to this
Section, the certificate of merit shall be executed in the form of an affidavit by
the claimant, or the attorney for the claimant, or a licensed physician, declaring
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1470 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 500
under oath one of the following:
(aa) The affiant has reviewed the facts of the case as an expert, or in
consultation with at least one expert, who is qualified pursuant to the Louisiana
Code of Civil Procedure and the Louisiana Code of Evidence to give expert
testimony regarding the standard of care and negligence pertaining to the
subject matter and medical specialty relevant to the particular medical
malpractice claim being brought and that, on the basis of such review or
consultation, a reasonable, good faith basis for the commencement of such
action exists.
(bb) A physician licensed and board certified or otherwise qualified by
education or experience in the medical subject matter of the claim has reviewed
the available medical records pertinent to the alleged medical malpractice and
has concluded that the acts or omissions of the defendant did not meet the
medical standard of care applicable to the facts of the claim and caused or
contributed to the claimant's injuries or death.
(iii) If a claimant elects to file a certificate of merit, but is unable to
timely obtain the expert consultation required by this Section because to do so
would mean that prescription would bar bringing the medical malpractice
action, then the claimant may file a certificate of merit within ninety days of all
defendants having filed their answer. If within ninety days the claimant has not
filed a certificate of merit, the action shall be dismissed.
(iv) If a claimant in a medical malpractice action elects to file a
certificate of merit, the filing of a single certificate of merit shall be sufficient to
meet the requirements of this Section, even if more than one defendant has been
named in the medical malpractice petition or is subsequently named.
(v) The filing of a request for review by a medical review panel, if elected
by the claimant to be filed as provided for in this Section, shall not be reportable
by any health care provider, the Louisiana Patient's Compensation Fund, or any other
entity to the Louisiana State Board of Medical Examiners, to any licensing authority,
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-1470 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 500
committee, or board of any other state, or to any credentialing or similar agency,
committee, or board of any clinic, hospital, health insurer, or managed care
company.